District of Columbia statutes.
28:11-101

Effective date.

The provisions of this act which amend article 9 and the provisions affecting secured transactions shall become effective at 12:01 A.M. on the 181st day after the effective date of this act.

Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-85, § 40, 29 DCR 309
This section is referenced in § 28:11-103, § 28:11-104, § 28:11-105, § 28:11-106, and § 28:11-107.
1981 Ed., § 28:11-101.
“This act”, referred to in this section, is D.C. Law 4-85.
D.C. Law 4-85 became law on March 16, 1982. The 181st day following March 16, 1982 was September 13, 1982.